Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB548.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Health care provider" means an individual licensed by the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure or the Kentucky Board of Nursing, pursuant to
KRS Chapter 311 or 314, whose scope of practice allows the performance or
supervision of a pelvic, rectal, or prostate examination;
(b) "Informed consent" means the signing of an intimate exam consent form
following a discussion process by which a patient or a person authorized to
make health care decisions for a patient willingly accepts a
recommendation for examination or treatment by a health care provider
upon disclosure of pertinent information about the examination or
treatment that satisfies the following conditions:
1. It is conducted in plain language that is understandable to a
layperson;
2. It includes a description of the nature and components of the
examination or treatment, the risks and benefits of the examination or
treatment, alternatives to the examination or treatment, and the
patient's right to refuse an examination or treatment or to revoke
consent after it has been given; and
3. It includes the identity and training status of individuals, including
students, who may be involved in the patient's care; and
(c) "Intimate exam consent form" means a separate medical examination form
memorializing an informed consent discussion that is signed by the patient
or a person authorized to make health care decisions for the patient, that
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 9/18/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 916
satisfies the following conditions:
1. It is written in plain language that is understandable to a layperson;
and
2. It includes the elements of informed consent as described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(2) A health care provider shall not knowingly perform or supervise the performance
of a pelvic, rectal, or prostate examination on a patient who is anesthetized or
unconscious unless one (1) of the following applies:
(a) The patient or a person authorized to make health care decisions for the
patient has given prior informed consent to the examination;
(b) The patient is unconscious and incapable of providing prior informed
consent, and the examination is necessary for diagnostic or treatment
purposes;
(c) The examination is within the scope and standard of care for a procedure or
diagnostic examination to be performed on the patient to which the patient
has given prior informed consent; or
(d) A court of competent jurisdiction orders the performance of the
examination for the collection of evidence and the order is issued in
compliance with all of the following provisions:
1. The court finds that there is a compelling need for the examination
that cannot be accommodated by other means. In assessing
compelling need, the court shall weigh the need for the examination
and the disclosure of the results against the privacy interest of the
individual to be examined; and
2. Pleadings pertaining to the ordering of the examination shall
substitute a pseudonym for the true name of the subject of the
examination. The true name shall be communicated confidentially to
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 9/18/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 916
the court and kept under seal of the court.
(3) A health care provider shall notify the patient as soon as reasonably practicable
that an examination under subsection (2) of this section was performed.
(4) A health care provider who violates subsection (2) of this section shall be subject
to discipline by the appropriate professional licensing or certification board.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 9/18/2025 1:26 PM Jacketed